Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2445.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 6630YH (2) 91 da/js H.F. 2445 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 459.311F Manure management planning 1 map. 2 1. The department shall prepare and publish on its internet 3 site a manure management planning map to assist a person 4 applying manure originating from an animal feeding operation. 5 2. The manure management planning map shall be part of an 6 interactive computer program. The map shall be in the form of 7 a digital dynamic map that incorporates geographic information 8 system technology in a manner that allows a user to immediately 9 identify areas that are vulnerable to pollution caused by 10 manure application due to one or more factors identified by the 11 department, including but not limited to any of the following: 12 a. Terrain, including karst terrain, and topography. 13 b. The effect of climatic conditions. 14 c. The proximity to a designated area or a water source, 15 including a high-quality water resource. 16 3. The manure management planning map shall be designed to 17 assist a person to apply manure in the most efficient practical 18 manner possible while reducing risks associated with runoff, 19 including by adjusting application rates and timing. 20 Sec. 2. Section 459.312, subsection 10, Code 2026, is 21 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 22 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0c. A verification that the person consults 23 the manure management planning map as provided in section 24 459.311F prior to application. 25 Sec. 3. Section 459A.208, subsection 7, Code 2026, is 26 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 27 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0c. A verification that the person consults 28 the manure management planning map as provided in section 29 459.311F prior to application. 30